Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB655.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 304.17C-085 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Contractual discount" means a percentage reduction from a provider's usual
and customary rate for covered services [and material ]required under a
participating provider agreement; and
(b) "Covered services":
1. Means services and materials for which:
a.[1.] Reimbursement from a plan is provided by the enrollee's plan
contract; or
b.[2.] Reimbursement would be available but for the application of the
enrollee's contractual limitations of deductibles, copayments,
coinsurance, or frequency limitations; and
2. Does not include services and materials for which reimbursement
would be available but for the application of the enrollee's contractual
limitation of an annual maximum benefit.
(2) A participating provider agreement shall not require a participating provider to
provide services to an enrollee at a fee set by or subject to the approval of the
limited health service benefit plan unless the services are covered services under the
participating provider agreement.
(3) A provider shall not charge more for services and materials that are noncovered
services under a limited health service benefit plan than the provider's rate for the
services and materials.
(4) The amount of a contractual discount shall not result in a fee that is less than the
limited health service benefit plan would pay for covered services but for the
application an enrollee's contractual limitations of deductibles, copayments,
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2026 3:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2136
coinsurance, or frequency limitations.
(5) Reimbursement paid by the limited health service benefit plan for covered services:
(a) Shall be reasonable; and
(b) Shall not provide nominal reimbursement in order to claim that services and
materials are covered services.
(6) The provisions of this section shall not be waived by contract. Any contractual
arrangement in conflict with this section or that purports to waive any
requirement of this section shall be void.
Section 2. This Act applies to contracts issued or renewed on or after the
effective date of this Act.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2026 3:15 PM Jacketed